Mississippi, session 2026, SB2884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) Study committee established.  There is hereby created the Property Tax Elimination and Replacement Study Committee to examine, evaluate and develop recommendations regarding the means for and effects of eliminating ad valorem taxes on real property, and the most effective ways of replacing the revenue that would be lost as a result of such elimination.  The committee shall, at a minimum: (a)  Conduct a comprehensive review of the contribution of ad valorem taxes on real property to the revenue of local governments throughout the state, including counties, municipalities, and school districts, over the past ten (10) years; (b)  Evaluate the cost savings to local governments that would result from elimination of the duties associated with the assessment and collection of ad valorem taxes on real property; (c)  Assess the impact on the state appropriations process of the revenue loss to local governments that would result from the elimination of ad valorem taxes on real property; (d)  Explore and evaluate alternative methods for raising the revenue that would be lost from the elimination of ad valorem taxes on real property, including methods that would directly fund local governments, as well as methods that would directly fund state government; and (e)  Develop recommendations for legislative or administrative reforms to be implemented in the next legislative session. (2)  Composition of the committee.  (a)  The committee shall be composed of the following twelve (12) members: (i)  The Commissioner of Revenue; (ii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor; (iii)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (iv)  One (1) member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (v)  The Chair of the Senate Finance Committee, or his/her designee; (vi)  The Chair of the House Ways and Means Committee, or his/her designee; (vii)  The Chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, or his/her designee; (viii)  The Chair of the House Appropriations A Committee, or his/her designee; (ix)  The Chair of the Senate Agriculture Committee, or his/her designee; (x)  The Chair of the House Agriculture Committee, or his/her designee; (xi)  The Chair of the Senate Forestry Committee, or his/her designee; and (xii)  The Chair of the House Forestry Committee, or his/her designee. (b)  Appointments to the committee shall be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act. (3)  Committee organization and responsibilities.  (a)  At its first meeting, the committee shall: (i)  Elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its members; and (ii)  Establish rules for transacting business and keeping records. (b)  The committee shall meet as necessary and report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature no later than December 1, 2026. (c)  A majority of committee members shall constitute a quorum for conducting business. (4)  Support and cooperation.  (a)  The Department of Revenue shall provide necessary staff and administrative support to the committee. (b)  In addition, the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) may provide additional staff and administrative support to the committee upon request and subject to available resources. (c)  To achieve its objectives, the committee may request data, analysis and assistance from any state agency, division or political subdivision. (5)  Compensation of committee members.  (a)  Legislative members of the study committee shall be entitled to per diem and reimbursement of expenses in accordance with Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. (b)  Non-legislative members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses from any available funds designated for such purposes. (6)  Dissolution of the committee.  The committee shall be dissolved on January 1, 2027, or upon the submission of its final report, whichever is earlier. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.